District of Columbia statutes.
47-3604

Annual report.

The Mayor shall, before February 2nd each year, submit to the Council an annual report which details the activities, and operation of the employee deferred compensation program for the preceding fiscal year.

Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-118, § 5, 31 DCR 4034
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-3604.